Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1029.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 221. (1) The director may by order require a domestic credit union to close its principal place of business or 1 or more branches if it appears to the director determines that the action is required because an emergency exists. The facilities closed shall must remain closed until the director by order finds that the emergency is ended. The director shall promptly notify the governor of the issuance of an order under this section. (2) The director may authorize a domestic credit union to close on a day designated by the president of the United States or the governor of this state as a day of national mourning, rejoicing, or other special observance. (3) If the director has not issued and does not issue an order of emergency under subsection (1) and the general manager or other designated officer of a domestic credit union determines that an emergency exists, the designated officer may close the principal place of business or 1 or more branches of the domestic credit union until he or she the designated officer finds that the emergency is ended. (4) A domestic credit union closing its principal place of business or 1 or more branches under this section shall give notice to the director, and to any other appropriate governmental entity if as otherwise required by law. (5) The period during which the principal place of business of a domestic credit union is closed under this section is considered an emergency condition or a legal holiday, and not a banking day, if the status of the closing as a legal holiday, banking day, or a response to an emergency is relevant to any legal obligation of the domestic credit union. (6) This section does not alter any obligations of a domestic credit union to its employees or to the employees of another employer under state or federal law.